Maryland, session 2026, HB0779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
Subtitle 10. Sea Level Rise Inundation and Coastal, NUISANCE, AND RIVERINE
Flooding.
3–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Council” means the Coast Smart Council.
(d) “Design criteria” means standard specifications related to the shape, size, or
form of a construction practice.
(f) “Highway facility” has the meaning stated in § 3–101(f) of the Transportation
Article.
(h) (1) “Replacement cost” means, at the time of reconstruction, the cost of
reconstructing a structure and its surrounding property to full use with materials of the
same kind and quality as the original materials.
(2) “Replacement cost” does not include:
(i) The value of the land on which a structure is located; or
(ii) For tax purposes, a deduction for depreciation.
(k) “Siting criteria” means specifications related to the location or use of a
structure or highway facility.
(l) “Structure” means:
(1) A walled or roofed building;
(2) A manufactured home; or
(3) A gas or liquid storage tank that is principally above ground.
(m) “Substantial damage” means damage caused by any source that is sustained
by a structure such that the cost of reconstruction to its before–damaged condition is at
least half of the structure’s replacement cost before the damage occurred.
3–1004.

HOUSE BILL 779 3
(a) There is a Coast Smart Council in the Department.
(b) The Department shall provide staff support for the Council.
3–1005.
(a) The Coast Smart Council shall include:
(1) The Secretary of Natural Resources, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) The Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) The Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) The Secretary of General Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) The Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) The Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary’s designee;
(7) The Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(8) The Chair of the Critical Area Commission for the Chesapeake and
Atlantic Coastal Bays, or the Chair’s designee;
(9) The Secretary of Emergency Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(10) The Comptroller, or the Comptroller’s designee;
(11) The Chancellor of the University System of Maryland, or the
Chancellor’s designee; and
(12) Five members appointed by the Governor to represent local
government, environmental, and business interests.
3–1006.
(a) The Council shall:
(1) Study and provide analysis regarding standards and factors relevant to
the establishment of Coast Smart siting criteria and design criteria;
(2) Develop siting and design criteria to establish and implement Coast
Smart practices and requirements;

HOUSE BILL 779
(3) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT RIVERINE SITING AND DESIGN
CRITERIA IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–1021 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) Develop eligibility criteria, standards, and procedures for applying for
and obtaining a waiver from compliance with the Coast Smart requirements;
[(4)] (5) Establish procedures for evaluating Coast Smart waiver
applications that include the consideration of proposed capital projects with regard to:
(i) The anticipated need to prepare for, respond to, and recover from
extreme weather events, sea level rise inundation, coastal flooding, storm surges, and
shoreline erosion; and
(ii) The need to prevent danger to life and property and to avoid
environmental, socio–economic, and economic harm; and
[(5)] (6) Develop eligibility criteria, standards, and procedures for
categorical exemptions from the application of the Coast Smart requirements for proposed
capital projects that have been designed to include adaptation and resiliency features to
prevent or mitigate damage to the maximum extent practicable.
(b) The Council may recommend regulations for adoption by the Secretary to
carry out the provisions of this subtitle.
(c) The chair of the Council may establish subcommittees consisting of members
of the Council, experts in fields related to climate change and sea level rise, and interested
parties to address or study specific issues.
3–1019. RESERVED.
3–1020. RESERVED.
PART VII. RIVERINE SITING AND DESIGN CRITERIA.
3–1021.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO STATE AND LOCAL CAPITAL PROJECTS
FOR WHICH AT LEAST 50% OF THE PROJECT COSTS ARE FUNDED WITH STATE
FUNDS.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CAPITAL PROJECT THAT
COSTS LESS THAN $500,000.
(B) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, IF A STATE OR LOCAL CAPITAL
PROJECT INCLUDES THE CONSTRUCTION OF A STRUCTURE OR HIGHWAY FACILITY,

HOUSE BILL 779 5
THE STRUCTURE OR HIGHWAY FACILITY SHALL BE CONSTRUCTED IN COMPLIANCE
WITH THE SITING AND DESIGN CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, IF A STATE OR LOCAL CAPITAL
PROJECT INCLUDES THE RECONSTRUCTION OF A STRUCTURE WITH SUBSTANTIAL
DAMAGE, THE STRUCTURE SHALL BE RECONSTRUCTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE
SITING AND DESIGN CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COUNCIL, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, SHALL ESTABLISH RIVERINE SITING AND
DESIGN CRITERIA TO ADDRESS THE 500–YEAR FLOOD IMPACTS ON STATE AND
LOCAL CAPITAL PROJECTS.
(2) THE CRITERIA ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE DATA, MODELS, METHODS, AND
MAPS TO BE USED TO DEFINE THE 500–YEAR FLOOD EVENT FOR SITES IN RIVERINE
AREAS;
(II) GUIDELINES AND ANY OTHER DIRECTIVE APPLICABLE TO
THE PRELIMINARY PLANNING AND CONSTRUCTION OF A PROPOSED CAPITAL
PROJECT;
(III) A REQUIREMENT THAT A STRUCTURE BE DESIGNED AND
CONSTRUCTED OR RECONSTRUCTED IN A MANNER TO WITHSTAND FLOODING
ASSOCIATED WITH A 500–YEAR FLOOD EVENT, INCLUDING A REQUIREMENT FOR
STRUCTURES TO BE CONSTRUCTED OR RECONSTRUCTED IN A MANNER THAT
ENSURES THAT THE STRUCTURE WILL NOT BE INUNDATED BY A 500–YEAR FLOOD
EVENT; AND
(IV) PROVISIONS ESTABLISHING A PROCESS TO ALLOW A UNIT
OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO OBTAIN A WAIVER FROM COMPLYING WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2032, AND EVERY 5 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE COUNCIL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT OF
THE ENVIRONMENT, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, SHALL REVIEW
AND, IF NECESSARY, UPDATE THE RIVERINE SITING AND DESIGN CRITERIA
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 779
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2032, AND EVERY 5 YEARS
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A SUMMARY OF THE RESULTS OF THE REVIEW CONDUCTED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.